Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-231
Burden of proof.

In any civil proceeding alleging a violation of the Telemarketing and Prize Promotions Act, the burden of proving an exemption from the act or an exemption from a definition in the act is upon the person claiming it. In any criminal proceeding alleging a violation of the act, the burden of producing evidence pertaining to a definition or an exemption is upon the person claiming it.

Laws 1999, LB 469, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-2010;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 93.